Hawaii statutes.
§560:2-602 Will may pass all
property and after-acquired property. A will may provide for the passage
of all property the testator owns at death and all property acquired by the
estate after the testator's death. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next